Connecticut, session 2026, HB05284.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026, and applicable to assessment
years commencing on or after October 1, 2026) Any municipality may, upon
approval by its legislative body or, in any town in which the legislative
body is a town meeting, by the board of selectmen, adopt an ordinance
allowing for the abatement of up to five hundred dollars, for a period
not exceeding five assessment years, of the real property taxes due upon
any residential property owned by a person who purchased such
property with funds provided to qualified first-time homebuyers by the
Connecticut Housing Finance Authority and which property is
encumbered by a mortgage financed, directly or indirectly, by the
Connecticut Housing Finance Authority. For the purposes of this
section, "residential property" means a single-family residential
dwelling that is the principal residence of the owner of such property.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026, and New section
applicable to assessment
years commencing on or
after October 1, 2026
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5284
PD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2